Utah statutes.
53-10-105.   Assistance to law enforcement agencies -- Investigation of
crimes -- Laboratory facilities.
(1)  The commissioner may assist any law enforcement agency in:
(a)  establishing identification and investigation records systems;
(b)  establishing uniform crime reporting systems;
(c)  investigating any crime;
(d)  coordinating the exchange of criminal identification, intelligence, and
investigation information among law enforcement agencies; and
(e)  providing the agencies with equipment, technical assistance, and
instruction.
(2) (a)  At the governor's direction, the commissioner shall assign division
employees to investigate any crime within this state for the purpose of
identifying, apprehending, and convicting the perpetrator or perpetrators of
that crime even if the commissioner has not received a request from a law
enforcement agency.
(b)  The governor may establish a time period for the commissioner to pursue
the investigation.
(c)  To accomplish the purposes of this section, the commissioner may provide,
through the division, crime detection laboratory facilities.
